.config/sublime-text-3/Packages/User/en_ru.aff
SFX 71 Y 108
SFX 71   чься кутся        чься
SFX 71   чься кусь         чься
SFX 71   чь   кут          чь
SFX 71   чь   ку           чь
SFX 71   ыться оешься       ыться
SFX 71   ыться оется        ыться
SFX 71   ыться оетесь       ыться
SFX 71   ыться оемся        ыться
SFX 71   ыться оются        ыться
SFX 71   ыться оюсь         ыться
SFX 71   ыть  оешь         ыть
SFX 71   ыть  оете         ыть
SFX 71   ыть  оет          ыть
SFX 71   ыть  оем          ыть
SFX 71   ыть  оют          ыть
SFX 71   ыть  ою           ыть
SFX 71   ься  ся           уться
SFX 71   ься  ешься        чься
SFX 71   ься  ется         чься
SFX 71   ься  етесь        чься
SFX 71   ься  емся         чься
SFX 71   ься  ёшься        чься
SFX 71   ься  ётся         чься
SFX 71   ься  ётесь        чься
SFX 71   ься  ёмся         чься
SFX 71   ь    ешь          чь
SFX 71   ь    ете          чь
SFX 71   ь    ет           чь
SFX 71   ь    ем           чь
SFX 71   ь    ёшь          чь
SFX 71   ь    ёте          чь
SFX 71   ь    ёт           чь
SFX 71   ь    ём           чь
SFX 71   уться ешься        уться
SFX 71   уться ется         уться
SFX 71   уться етесь        уться
SFX 71   уться емся         уться
SFX 71   уть  у            уть
SFX 71   уть  ешь          уть
SFX 71   уть  ете          уть
SFX 71   уть  ет           уть
SFX 71   уть  ем           уть
SFX 71   ться сь           уться
SFX 71   ться ешься        [ае]ться
SFX 71   ться ется         [ае]ться
SFX 71   ться етесь        [ае]ться
SFX 71   ться емся         [ае]ться
SFX 71   ться ются         [ае]ться
SFX 71   ться юсь          [ае]ться
SFX 71   ть   т            уть
SFX 71   ть   ешь          [ае]ть
SFX 71   ть   ете          [ае]ть
SFX 71   ть   ет           [ае]ть
SFX 71   ть   ем           [ае]ть
SFX 71   ть   ют           [ае]ть
SFX 71   ть   ю            [ае]ть
SFX 71   тись утся         [сз]тись
SFX 71   тись усь          [сз]тись
SFX 71   тись ешься        [сз]тись
SFX 71   тись ется         [сз]тись
SFX 71   тись етесь        [сз]тись
SFX 71   тись емся         [сз]тись
SFX 71   тись дутся        йтись
SFX 71   тись дусь         йтись
SFX 71   тись дешься       йтись
SFX 71   тись дется        йтись
SFX 71   тись детесь       йтись
SFX 71   тись демся        йтись
SFX 71   тись дёшься       йтись
SFX 71   тись дётся        йтись
SFX 71   тись дётесь       йтись
SFX 71   тись дёмся        йтись
SFX 71   тись ёшься        [сз]тись
SFX 71   тись ётся         [сз]тись
SFX 71   тись ётесь        [сз]тись
SFX 71   тись ёмся         [сз]тись
SFX 71   ти   ут           [сз]ти
SFX 71   ти   у            [сз]ти
SFX 71   ти   ешь          [сз]ти
SFX 71   ти   ете          [сз]ти
SFX 71   ти   ет           [сз]ти
SFX 71   ти   ем           [сз]ти
SFX 71   ти   дут          йти
SFX 71   ти   ду           йти
SFX 71   ти   дешь         йти
SFX 71   ти   дете         йти
SFX 71   ти   дет          йти
SFX 71   ти   дем          йти
SFX 71   ти   дёшь         йти
SFX 71   ти   дёте         йти
SFX 71   ти   дёт          йти
SFX 71   ти   дём          йти
SFX 71   ти   ёшь          [сз]ти
SFX 71   ти   ёте          [сз]ти
SFX 71   ти   ёт           [сз]ти
SFX 71   ти   ём           [сз]ти
SFX 71   оться ешься        оться
SFX 71   оться ется         оться
SFX 71   оться етесь        оться
SFX 71   оться емся         оться
SFX 71   оться ются         оться
SFX 71   оться юсь          оться
SFX 71   оть  ешь          оть
SFX 71   оть  ете          оть
SFX 71   оть  ет           оть
SFX 71   оть  ем           оть
SFX 71   оть  ют           оть
SFX 71   оть  ю            оть

SFX 72 Y 108
SFX 72   чься кутся        чься
SFX 72   чься кусь         чься
SFX 72   чь   кут          чь
SFX 72   чь   ку           чь
SFX 72   ыться оешься       ыться
SFX 72   ыться оется        ыться
SFX 72   ыться оетесь       ыться
SFX 72   ыться оемся        ыться
SFX 72   ыться оются        ыться
SFX 72   ыться оюсь         ыться
SFX 72   ыть  оешь         ыть
SFX 72   ыть  оете         ыть
SFX 72   ыть  оет          ыть
SFX 72   ыть  оем          ыть
SFX 72   ыть  оют          ыть
SFX 72   ыть  ою           ыть
SFX 72   ься  ся           уться
SFX 72   ься  ешься        чься
SFX 72   ься  ется         чься
SFX 72   ься  етесь        чься
SFX 72   ься  емся         чься
SFX 72   ься  ёшься        чься
SFX 72   ься  ётся         чься
SFX 72   ься  ётесь        чься
SFX 72   ься  ёмся         чься
SFX 72   ь    ешь          чь
SFX 72   ь    ете          чь
SFX 72   ь    ет           чь
SFX 72   ь    ем           чь
SFX 72   ь    ёшь          чь
SFX 72   ь    ёте          чь
SFX 72   ь    ёт           чь
SFX 72   ь    ём           чь
SFX 72   уться ешься        уться
SFX 72   уться ется         уться
SFX 72   уться етесь        уться
SFX 72   уться емся         уться
SFX 72   уть  у            уть
SFX 72   уть  ешь          уть
SFX 72   уть  ете          уть
SFX 72   уть  ет           уть
SFX 72   уть  ем           уть
SFX 72   ться сь           уться
SFX 72   ться ешься        [ае]ться
SFX 72   ться ется         [ае]ться
SFX 72   ться етесь        [ае]ться
SFX 72   ться емся         [ае]ться
SFX 72   ться ются         [ае]ться
SFX 72   ться юсь          [ае]ться
SFX 72   ть   т            уть
SFX 72   ть   ешь          [ае]ть
SFX 72   ть   ете          [ае]ть
SFX 72   ть   ет           [ае]ть
SFX 72   ть   ем           [ае]ть
SFX 72   ть   ют           [ае]ть
SFX 72   ть   ю            [ае]ть
SFX 72   тись утся         [сз]тись
SFX 72   тись усь          [сз]тись
SFX 72   тись ешься        [сз]тись
SFX 72   тись ется         [сз]тись
SFX 72   тись етесь        [сз]тись
SFX 72   тись емся         [сз]тись
SFX 72   тись дутся        йтись
SFX 72   тись дусь         йтись
SFX 72   тись дешься       йтись
SFX 72   тись дется        йтись
SFX 72   тись детесь       йтись
SFX 72   тись демся        йтись
SFX 72   тись дёшься       йтись
SFX 72   тись дётся        йтись
SFX 72   тись дётесь       йтись
SFX 72   тись дёмся        йтись
SFX 72   тись ёшься        [сз]тись
SFX 72   тись ётся         [сз]тись
SFX 72   тись ётесь        [сз]тись
SFX 72   тись ёмся         [сз]тись
SFX 72   ти   ут           [сз]ти
SFX 72   ти   у            [сз]ти
SFX 72   ти   ешь          [сз]ти
SFX 72   ти   ете          [сз]ти
SFX 72   ти   ет           [сз]ти
SFX 72   ти   ем           [сз]ти
SFX 72   ти   дут          йти
SFX 72   ти   ду           йти
SFX 72   ти   дешь         йти
SFX 72   ти   дете         йти
SFX 72   ти   дет          йти
SFX 72   ти   дем          йти
SFX 72   ти   дёшь         йти
SFX 72   ти   дёте         йти
SFX 72   ти   дёт          йти
SFX 72   ти   дём          йти
SFX 72   ти   ёшь          [сз]ти
SFX 72   ти   ёте          [сз]ти
SFX 72   ти   ёт           [сз]ти
SFX 72   ти   ём           [сз]ти
SFX 72   оться ешься        оться
SFX 72   оться ется         оться
SFX 72   оться етесь        оться
SFX 72   оться емся         оться
SFX 72   оться ются         оться
SFX 72   оться юсь          оться
SFX 72   оть  ешь          оть
SFX 72   оть  ете          оть
SFX 72   оть  ет           оть
SFX 72   оть  ем           оть
SFX 72   оть  ют           оть
SFX 72   оть  ю            оть

SFX 73 Y 1
SFX 73   0     's         .

SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74   0     's         .

SFX 75 Y 108
SFX 75   чься кутся        чься
SFX 75   чься кусь         чься
SFX 75   чь   кут          чь
SFX 75   чь   ку           чь
SFX 75   ыться оешься       ыться
SFX 75   ыться оется        ыться
SFX 75   ыться оетесь       ыться
SFX 75   ыться оемся        ыться
SFX 75   ыться оются        ыться
SFX 75   ыться оюсь         ыться
SFX 75   ыть  оешь         ыть
SFX 75   ыть  оете         ыть
SFX 75   ыть  оет          ыть
SFX 75   ыть  оем          ыть
SFX 75   ыть  оют          ыть
SFX 75   ыть  ою           ыть
SFX 75   ься  ся           уться
SFX 75   ься  ешься        чься
SFX 75   ься  ется         чься
SFX 75   ься  етесь        чься
SFX 75   ься  емся         чься
SFX 75   ься  ёшься        чься
SFX 75   ься  ётся         чься
SFX 75   ься  ётесь        чься
SFX 75   ься  ёмся         чься
SFX 75   ь    ешь          чь
SFX 75   ь    ете          чь
SFX 75   ь    ет           чь
SFX 75   ь    ем           чь
SFX 75   ь    ёшь          чь
SFX 75   ь    ёте          чь
SFX 75   ь    ёт           чь
SFX 75   ь    ём           чь
SFX 75   уться ешься        уться
SFX 75   уться ется         уться
SFX 75   уться етесь        уться
SFX 75   уться емся         уться
SFX 75   уть  у            уть
SFX 75   уть  ешь          уть
SFX 75   уть  ете          уть
SFX 75   уть  ет           уть
SFX 75   уть  ем           уть
SFX 75   ться сь           уться
SFX 75   ться ешься        [ае]ться
SFX 75   ться ется         [ае]ться
SFX 75   ться етесь        [ае]ться
SFX 75   ться емся         [ае]ться
SFX 75   ться ются         [ае]ться
SFX 75   ться юсь          [ае]ться
SFX 75   ть   т            уть
SFX 75   ть   ешь          [ае]ть
SFX 75   ть   ете          [ае]ть
SFX 75   ть   ет           [ае]ть
SFX 75   ть   ем           [ае]ть
SFX 75   ть   ют           [ае]ть
SFX 75   ть   ю            [ае]ть
SFX 75   тись утся         [сз]тись
SFX 75   тись усь          [сз]тись
SFX 75   тись ешься        [сз]тись
SFX 75   тись ется         [сз]тись
SFX 75   тись етесь        [сз]тись
SFX 75   тись емся         [сз]тись
SFX 75   тись дутся        йтись
SFX 75   тись дусь         йтись
SFX 75   тись дешься       йтись
SFX 75   тись дется        йтись
SFX 75   тись детесь       йтись
SFX 75   тись демся        йтись
SFX 75   тись дёшься       йтись
SFX 75   тись дётся        йтись
SFX 75   тись дётесь       йтись
SFX 75   тись дёмся        йтись
SFX 75   тись ёшься        [сз]тись
SFX 75   тись ётся         [сз]тись
SFX 75   тись ётесь        [сз]тись
SFX 75   тись ёмся         [сз]тись
SFX 75   ти   ут           [сз]ти
SFX 75   ти   у            [сз]ти
SFX 75   ти   ешь          [сз]ти
SFX 75   ти   ете          [сз]ти
SFX 75   ти   ет           [сз]ти
SFX 75   ти   ем           [сз]ти
SFX 75   ти   дут          йти
SFX 75   ти   ду           йти
SFX 75   ти   дешь         йти
SFX 75   ти   дете         йти
SFX 75   ти   дет          йти
SFX 75   ти   дем          йти
SFX 75   ти   дёшь         йти
SFX 75   ти   дёте         йти
SFX 75   ти   дёт          йти
SFX 75   ти   дём          йти
SFX 75   ти   ёшь          [сз]ти
SFX 75   ти   ёте          [сз]ти
SFX 75   ти   ёт           [сз]ти
SFX 75   ти   ём           [сз]ти
SFX 75   оться ешься        оться
SFX 75   оться ется         оться
SFX 75   оться етесь        оться
SFX 75   оться емся         оться
SFX 75   оться ются         оться
SFX 75   оться юсь          оться
SFX 75   оть  ешь          оть
SFX 75   оть  ете          оть
SFX 75   оть  ет           оть
SFX 75   оть  ем           оть
SFX 75   оть  ют           оть
SFX 75   оть  ю            оть

SFX 76 Y 17
SFX 76   ь    ями          [^жшщч]ь
SFX 76   ь    ям           [^жшщч]ь
SFX 76   ь    ях           [^жшщч]ь
SFX 76   ь    и            ь
SFX 76   ь    ей           ь
SFX 76   ь    ами          [жшщч]ь
SFX 76   ь    ам           [жшщч]ь
SFX 76   ь    ах           [жшщч]ь
SFX 76   0    у            [^ь]
SFX 76   0    ов           [^цжьшщч]
SFX 76   0    ом           [^цжьшщч]
SFX 76   0    е            [^ь]
SFX 76   0    ами          [^ь]
SFX 76   0    ам           [^ь]
SFX 76   0    ах           [^ь]
SFX 76   0    а            [^ь]
SFX 76   0    ю            ь

SFX 77 Y 17
SFX 77   ь    ями          [^жшщч]ь
SFX 77   ь    ям           [^жшщч]ь
SFX 77   ь    ях           [^жшщч]ь
SFX 77   ь    и            ь
SFX 77   ь    ей           ь
SFX 77   ь    ами          [жшщч]ь
SFX 77   ь    ам           [жшщч]ь
SFX 77   ь    ах           [жшщч]ь
SFX 77   0    у            [^ь]
SFX 77   0    ов           [^цжьшщч]
SFX 77   0    ом           [^цжьшщч]
SFX 77   0    е            [^ь]
SFX 77   0    ами          [^ь]
SFX 77   0    ам           [^ь]
SFX 77   0    ах           [^ь]
SFX 77   0    а            [^ь]
SFX 77   0    ю            ь
